src/fst/phonology.twolc
!2016.QQ
!Ablative d/t
"d:t"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
д:т  <=> [ CnsVoiceless | д: | г] (ь:) (%{ЕОØ%}: %^RmVow:|%{АОØ%}: %^RmVow:)  %> _ [ %{АО%}: ] ;
!__д:т од:оттне definite plural__
          _ (ь:)  [([%{ЕОØ%}:|%{ЕØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> [ %{Х%}: [ т: н е: | т я | т %{АЯ%}: | т %{ЬØ%}:  | %{КТ%}: ]| к [# | %> ]| ф [ # | %> ] | %{DIM%}: я: ]| %^Devoice: ] ;
!          _ (ь:)  [([%{ЕОØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> [ %{Х%}: [ т: н е: | т я | т %{АЯ%}: | т %{ЬØ%}: ] | %{КТ%}: | к | ф]| %^Devoice: | %> д: %{АО%}: ] ;
!! кулхцондомс+V+Imprt+ScSg2: **listen**
!!€ кулхцонд>{Х}{КТ}{ЬØ}
!!€ кулхцонт>0т0
!! офта+N+SP+Abl+Indef
!!€ офт%{АОØ%}%^RmVow%>д%{АО%}
!!€ офт00%>та
!!$ офт%{АОØ%}%^RmVow%>д%{АО%}
!!$ офт00%>да
!! кядь+N+SP+Abl+Indef: __hand;arm/käsi
!!€ кядь%>д%{АО%}
!!€ кядь%>та
!!$ кядь%>д%{АО%}
!!$ кять%>та
!! кандомс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1+OcSg2
!!€ канд%>%{Х%}тя
!!€ кант%>0тя
!!€ канд>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кант%>0т0
!!€ лемдь%>%^Devoice%>ф
!!€ лемть%>0%>ф
!!€ пильг%{ЕОØ%}%^RmVow%>д%{АО%}
!!€ пильг00%>та


"З:С"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 з:с <=> Vows _ (ь:) [%^Devoice: %^Ь2ZERO: |([%{ЕОØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> %{Х%}:] ;
!! изь+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3:	**they did not**
!!€ изь%^Devoice%^Ь2ZERO%>ть
!!€ ис000%>ть

  Vows _ (ь:) %> %{DIM%}: ;
!!€ келазь%>%{DIM%}я

"Ж:Ш"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 ж:ш <=> Vows _ (ь:) [%^Devoice:|([%{ЕОØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> %{Х%}:] ;

"ж:ч панчсь"
!! **@RULENAME@**
ж:ч <=> н _  %> [ с | т | ф  | %{Х%}:]  ;
!!€ панж%>сь
!!€ панч%>сь


"г:к"
!! **@RULENAME@**
г:к <=>
!"д:т од:оттне definite plural"
          _ ([%{ЕОØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:] %^RmVow:)  %> [ %{Х%}: [ т: н е: | т я | т %{АЯ%}: | т %{ЬØ%}:| %{КТ%}: ] | %{КТ%}: | к | ф ];
!!€ мярьг%>%{Х%}т%{АЯ%}ма
!!€ мярьк%>0тяма
     CnsVoiceless (ь) %> _ %{АЕ%}: [# | %- ] ;
!! содамс+V+Inf+Clt/Add: __to know/tietää__
!!€ сода>{ЕОØ}мс>г{АЕ}
!!€ сода>0мс>ка


"с:ц ломань:ломанць"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
с:ц <=> н ( ь: ) %> _ [ (т) ь | а | ы | ( т ) %{АО%}: | н | %> | # | %- ] ;

!Changes in suffix consonants

!!!Depricated due to 
!!ERROR: Label not found in 'EQV_LABELS' (114) **
!!Solved in several contexts by declaring both lexical
!!and surface forms in the alphabet.
"G1:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{гк%}:0 <=> [ [:Vows - [:и]] ((%>) К3:0 )  %> | К1: %{ЬØ%}:0 %> KLoss:0 | :к %> KLoss:0 ] _ а: ;


"G1:g"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{гк%}:г <=> [CnsVoicedDent (:ь|%{ЬØ%}:0)| й | и | [ CnsVoicedNonDent - г ] ( :ь )] %> _ [ а|%{АЕ%}:] ;
!! вал+Hom1+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Foc **word/sana**
!!€ вал%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ вал%>га
!! аля+N+Sg+Dat+PxSg2+Foc **father/isä**
!!€ аля%>цти%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ аля%>цти%>ге

"G1:k"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{гк%}:к <=>  [ CnsVoicelessDent ( :ь | %{ЬØ%}:0 | %{ЬØ%}:ь ) | CnsVoicelessNonDent | г | т %{ЬØ%}: | К1: %{ЬØ%}: | К4:0 ] :0* %> _ [а|%{АЕ%}:]  ;
!! вал+Hom1+N+SP+Ill+Indef+Foc **word/sana**
!!€ вал%>с%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ вал%>с%>ка
!! офто+N+SP+Abl+PxPl2+Foc
!!€ офт%{АОØ%}%>д%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нт%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ офто%>до%>0нт%>ка
!! ава+N+SP+Ela+PxPl2+Foc
!!€ тядя%>ст%{АО%}%>%{ЕОØ%}нт%>%{гк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ тядя%>сто%>0нт%>ка

!"e:i"
!!! **@RULENAME@**
! е:и <=> Cns _ %> %{ИЫЙ%}: ;
!!! кунцемс+V+Der+Der/NomAg+N+Sg+Nom+Indef+Clt/Cop+Prs+ScSg2
!!!€ кунце>{ИЫЙ}>{АЯ}т
!!!€ кунци>0>ят



!Lative
"%{ВИУ%}:v"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{ВИУ%}:в <=> [а | я | и] %> _ ;

!Lative
"%{ВИУ%}:i"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{ВИУ%}:и <=> [е: | ь: ] (%^Ь2ZERO:) %> _ ;
                Vows й: %> _ ;
!! учительскай+N+SP+Lat+Indef: **teachers' lounge/opettajain huone**
!!€ учительскай>{ВИУ}
!!€ учительска0>и
         [FTV - [ы|и]| ь: ] NPC* CnsNonDent %> _ ;
!! пирьф+N+SP+Lat+Indef: **garden/tarha**
!!€ пирьф%>%{ВИУ%}
!!€ пирьф%>и


!Lative
"%{ВИУ%}:u"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{ВИУ%}:у <=> [[BTV NPC* CnsNonDent | CnsDent] (%{АОØ%}: %^RmVow: )|%{АЕØ%}:| %{АО%}:] %> _ ;
! [NPC (%{АОØ%}: %^RmVow: )|%{АЕØ%}:] %> _ ;
!! уша+N+SP+Lat+Indef: **outdoors**
!!€ уш%{АЕØ%}%>%{ВИУ%}
!!€ уше%>у
   [ы|и] NPC* CnsNonDent %> _ ;
!!€ Крым%>%{ВИУ%}
!!€ Крым%>у

!Prolative
"G2:g"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{вгк%}:г <=> [ CnsVoicedDent ( :ь )|и| [ CnsVoicedNonDent - г ] ( :ь ) ] %> _ %{АЕ%}: ;

"G2:v"! 
%{вгк%}:в <=>  [:Vows - :и] (%^Я2А:) %>  _ %{АЕ%}: ;
!! вальмя+N+SP+Prl+Indef
!!€ вальмя%^Я2А%>%{вгк%}%{АЕ%}
!!€ вальма0%>ва


"G2:k"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{вгк%}:к <=>  [ CnsVoicelessDent ( :ь )| CnsVoicelessNonDent ( :ь )| г ] %> _ %{АЕ%}: ;

! 2012-08-07
"G4:g" !Imperative Clitics
Г4:г  <=> з ь %> _ а ;



"G4:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Г4:0  <=>
           [ К1: %{ЬØ%}: | к ] %> _ а ;
  [%{АО%}: ] %> _ а: ;

"G4:k"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
Г4:к  <=>  # [и л я|у ж о|а з ё|а д я|а й д а] %> _ а  ;


"m:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
м:0 <=> 
 BTV  _ %{АОØ%}:0  %>  %^RmVow: [ т| т н е: ] ;



!2016.QQ
!! ### imperative suffix
"К1 %{КТ%}:t left"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{КТ%}:т <= [ Vows н: | CnsVoiceless |CnsVoiced: - г:] ( ь: ) %> (%{Х%}:) _  ;
!!€ пань%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ пан0%>ть

"К1 %{КТ%}:t right"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{КТ%}:т =>  [ н: | CnsVoiceless |CnsVoiced: - г:| д: ] ( ь: ) %> (%{Х%}:) _  ;
!!€ канд>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кант>00т0
!!€ пань%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ пан0%>ть

!2016.QQ
"К1 %{КТ%}:к left"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{КТ%}:к <=  [ Vows ] %> (%{Х%}:) _  ;
! %> %{Х%}: [ т | %{КТ%}: ] 
!!€ кунда>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кунда00к0

"К1 %{КТ%}:к right"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 %{КТ%}:к =>  [ Vows | д: ( ь: ) ] %> (%{Х%}:) _  ;
! %> %{Х%}: [ т | %{КТ%}: ] 
!!€ кунда>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кунда00к0

"К1 %{КТ%}:0 "
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{КТ%}:0 <=>  г: %> (%{Х%}:) _  ;
!! кельгомс+V+ConNegII:
!!€ кельг>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ кельк%>000

!2016.QQ
! Suffix final hard vs soft
"%{ЬØ%}:ь"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{ЬØ%}:ь <=> [ ь:|й:] ([%{ЕØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> (%{Х%}:) т:  _ ;
 [ ь:|й:| [# Cns* я |и|е|э|ы] [CnsNonDent:]] ([%{ЕØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> (%{Х%}:)  %{КТ%}:  _ ;

!!€ пань%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ пан0%>ть
!! симомс+V+Imprt+ScSg2
!!€ сим%>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ сип%>0ть
!!$ сим%>%{Х%}%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!$ сип%>0т0

"%{ЬØ%}:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
%{ЬØ%}:0 <=> 
 [ Cns: - [ь:|й:]] ([%{ЕØ%}:|%{ЕОØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> (%{Х%}:) т:  _ ;
!! зепе+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: **pocket/tasku**
!!€ зеп%{ЕОØ%}%^RmVow%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ зеп00%>0т0

 [CnsDent: |[Vows - [я|и|е|э|ы]|Vows Cns+ я ] [CnsNonDent:]|CnsAndSoft [CnsNonDent:] |Vows] ([%{ЕØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> (%{Х%}:)  %{КТ%}:  _ ;
 :Vows (%^Я2А:) %> %{Х%}: т _ ;
 ! :BTV %> %{Х%}: т _ ;
!! ши+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: **day/päivä**
!!€ ши%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ ши%>0т0
!!€ пань%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ пан0%>ть
!! вальмя+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: **window/ikkuna**
!!€ вальмя%^Я2А%>%{Х%}т%{ЬØ%}
!!€ вальма0%>0т0


!! Plural before definite plural following a consonant
"t:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
т:0 <=>
[б:|в:|ж:|з: ( ь: )| й: |г:|к| л ( ь: ) |м: |п| р ( ь: ) |с ( ь: ) |ф|х|ц ( ь: ) |ч|ш|щ] ([%{ЕОØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:] %^RmVow:) %> %{Х%}: _ н е: ;
!! Ананьина К.И. 2000: 55
!!€ ава%>%{Х%}тне
!!€ ава%>0тне
!!€ шуфт%>%{Х%}тне
!!€ шуфт%>0тне
!!€ нармот0%>0тне
!!€ лав%>%{Х%}тне
!!€ лаф%>00не
!!$ лав%>%{Х%}тне
!!$ лаф%>0тне

![б:|д: ( ь: ) |ж:|з: ( ь: )| й |г:|к| л ( ь: ) |м:|н: ( ь: ) |п| р ( ь: ) |с ( ь: ) |т ( ь: ) |ф|х|ц ( ь: ) |ч|ш|щ] %> %{Х%}: _ н е: ;

!!SLoss s s > s = s 0 0 s
"s:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
с:0 <=> с _ %> SLoss:0 с ;

!!€ класс%>SLossс
!!€ клас000с
!2016.03!




!Word final Vowels

!2016.QQ
"y:0"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
 ь:0 <=> 
  [ н: | д: | т | з: ] _ (%{ЕØ%}: %^RmVow:) %> (%{Х%}:) [ т: | ц е | %{КТ%}: ] ; 
!! plural
!!€ пань%>%{КТ%}%{ЬØ%}
!!€ пан0%>ть
  [ н | р | д | з ] _  %> [ %{DIM%}: я | н е] ; 
!! ведь+N+Der+Der/Dimin+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: **a little water**
!!€ ведь%>%{DIM%}я
!!€ вед0%>ня
! also
!!€ ингольдень>не
!!€ ингольден0>не

CnsDent: _ ( %>|%^PXSG1: %>) [ %{АЯ%}: | %{ИЫЙ%}: | %{ЕØ%}:е | %{ЕОØ%}:е | (%^Ь2ZERO: %> ) %{ВИУ%}: ] ;
!!€ мяль%>%{ЕОØ%}зе
!!€ мял0%>езе
!! мирде+N+Sg+Nom: **husband/aviomies**
!!€ мирдь%{ЕØ%}#
!!€ мирд0е#
[ CnsDent: - [ л: | р: ] ] _ %^PXSG1: %> н е ;
!! кядь+N+Pl+Nom+PxSg1: **hand; arm**
!!€ кядь%^PXSG1%>не
!!€ кяд00%>не

[ч|ш|ж] _ %> с ;
!! учемс+V+Ind+Prt1+ScSg3
!!€ учь%>сь
!!€ уч0%>сь

[ CnsDent: - [ л: ] ] _ %> ц е ;
!! нярь+N+Sg+Gen+PxSg2: **hand; arm**
!!€ нярь%>це
!!€ няр0%>це

    _ %> [ и | %{АЕØ%}:е ] ;
!    _ %> %{АЕØ%}:е ;
!!€ афоль%>ине
!!€ афол0%>ине

 CnsDentNoL _ %> [ф т %{ЕОØ%}: м [ %{ЕОØ%}: ] | К1: | н | т | с: (т) [ ь: | е: ]] ;
!2018-07-01 CnsDentNoL _ %> [ф т %{ЕОØ%}: м [ %{ЕОØ%}: ] | К1: | н | д: | т | с: (т) [ ь: | е: ]] ;
 Cns: _ (%^Devoice:) %^Ь2ZERO: ;
!! изь+V+Aux+Neg+Ind+Prt1+ScPl3: **they did not**
!!€ изь%^Devoice%^Ь2ZERO%>ть
!!€ ис000%>ть
!2016.QQ
!! ломань+N+SP+Abl+Indef:
!!$ ломань%>д%{АО%}
!!$ ломань%>да


!! ### DIMINUTIVES
"%{DIM%}:н"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{DIM%}:н <=> [ Vows: | :Vows | %{ЕОØ%}:|%{АОØ%}:| м  | ж | б | в | н | д | л | р  | з | :й] (ь:)  %> _ я ;
!!€ ши%>%{DIM%}я
!!€ ши%>ня
!!€ ара%>%{ИЫЙ%}%>%{DIM%}я
!!€ ара%>й%>ня
        к %> %{ЕО%}: _ я ;

"%{DIM%}:к"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{DIM%}:к <=> [ ф | т | ц | ч | :с | ш | х ] (ь) %> _ я: ;
!!€ пикс>%{DIM%}я
!!€ пикс0кя


!!Allow the absence of "ъ" in the first syllable
!"Loss of ъ in the first syllable orthography"
!ъ:0 <= # Cns* _ [ д | з | р | т ] ; REMOVE 2018-09-12

"%{ъØ%}:ъ"
!! **@RULENAME@**
 %{ъØ%}:ъ <=>
 [# | Cns: ] _ \[ # ]* %^Ъ2PED: ;


!! ## Disallow

"Disallow TLoss after non-t"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
TLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :т ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow KLoss after non-k"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
KLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :к ] ] %> _ ;

"Disallow SLoss after non-s"
!! **@RULENAME@**  
SLoss:0 /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :* :с ] ] %> _ ;

!"Disallow VLoss after non-U2I2"
!!! __@RULENAME@__  
!VLoss:0 /<= [[ :* [ Letters | А1: | %{АЯ%}: | %{ИЫЙ%}: | К1:  | %{ЬØ%}: | %{гк%}: | %{вгк%}: | К3:  ] ] - [ :* [ У2: | И2: ] ] ] %> _ ;


!"Disallow translative linking vowel vs no linking vowel "
!!! __@RULENAME@__
! k:k /<= [[ :* Letters ] - [ :*  к ]] %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ с  ;
!          к  %>  _ с  ;

"Disallow овок"
!! **@RULENAME@**
в:в /<=
    	[Cns|Vows] [б|в|г|д|ж|з|й:|л|м|н|п|р|с|ф|х|ц|ш|щ] (ь:) %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ о к ;
    	%> [с |т|%{ЕОØ%}: с т|%{ЕОØ%}: ц|%{ЕОØ%}: н|%{ЕОØ%}: н ь к о н ] (ь:) %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ о к ;

"Disallow Онга"
!! **@RULENAME@**
н:н /<=
    	%> [ш к а] %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ г а ;
        %{ЕОØ%}: _ к %> (н) %{гк%}: %{АЕ%}: ;
        %{ЕОØ%}: _ %> н г %{АЕ%}: ;
       [ Cns| с | н е] %> _ г %{АЕ%}: ; !Pl+Nom+Def/PxSg1
!        %{ЕОØ%}: _ [ к|т ] %> (н) %{гк%}: %{АЕ%}: ;
!!$ куд>{ЕОØ}нз{АО}>{ЕОØ}н>нг{АЕ}
!!$ куд>онзо>0н>нга

"Disallow -кс: нетькскс"
!! **@RULENAME@**
к:к /<=
       к с %> _ с ;
       к [Cns - с] (ь:) %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ с ;
       [Vows|Cns - [с|ц|ш|ч|д|т]] (ь:) %> %{ЕО%}: %> ш _ а ;
       Vows %> %{ЕОØ%}: _ с ;
       [Cns - [т|к|п|с]] (ь:) %> %{ЕОØ%}: в о _ ;

"Disallow -гя only after a few"
!! **@RULENAME@**
я:я /<=
     [[:Vows - [:и]] (%^Я2А:) |[Cns - [й]]|[Cns - [л|н|з|р|д]] ь:] %> г _ [# | %- |%>];
      [Cns - к] %> %{ЕО%}: %{DIM%}: _ ;
      _ %> %{ЕОØ%}: в а ;

"Disallow special imperative in K after vowel stems"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%{Х%}:0 /<= Vows %> _ к ;

"Disallow final е lowering to я tag elsewhere"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^Е2Я:0 /<= [[:Letters - [:е|е:|%{ЕØ%}:я|%{ЕО%}:я|%{ЕОØ%}:я|%{АЕ%}:я]]|#|%>|:0] _ ;

"Disallow onset vowel after voiced cons"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^PXSG1:0 /<=
     [г|й:|к|п|ф|х|ш|щ|ч|[т|с] (ь:) ] _ %>  н е [%>|# | %- ] ;
     [Vows:|б|в|ж|м|[д|з|л|н|р] (ь:) ] _ %> %{ЕОØ%}: н е [%>|# | %- ] ;

"Disallow Ь2ZERO"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^Ь2ZERO:0 /<= [Vows|Cns] _ %> с;

"Disallow ЬKEEP"
!! **@RULENAME@**
%^ЬKEEP:0 /<= [Vows|Cns - [ф | т | ц | ч | :с | ш | х]| л ь] _ %> н я ;

!!TESTS
!echo 'п а н ж:ч > с ы' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'панжемс+V+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcSg3' | hfst-lookup src/fst/lexicon.hfst
!echo 'с и м:п > {Х}:0 {КТ}:т {ЬØ}:ь' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfs
